Arkansas, session 2025, SB357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-4-204, concerning the accrual of leave
under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(h)(1)(A) An employee under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this
section shall receive military service credit for prior military service that
otherwise would not be creditable for the purpose of determining his or her
annual leave accrual rate.
(B) Subdivision (h)(1)(A) of this section applies
only if the employee:
(i) Retired from military service;
(ii) Was honorably discharged from military
service;
(iii) Currently serves in the Arkansas
*LGL125*
03/03/2025 12:50:35 PM LGL125

SB357
National Guard and served in the Arkansas National Guard before employment
with the State of Arkansas;
(iv) Served in the Arkansas National Guard
before employment with the State of Arkansas;
(iv) Currently serves in a military reserve
unit and served in a military reserve unit before employment with the State
of Arkansas; or
(v) Served in a military reserve unit before
employment with the State of Arkansas.
(2)(A) An agency head, or his or her designee, shall provide
military service credit for the purpose of determining the annual leave
accrual rate under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section to an employee
described in subdivision (h)(1)(B) of this section upon written documentation
of the employee's military service.
(B) A retired or honorably discharged member of the
military shall provide an agency head, or his or her designee, a copy of his
or her discharge information.
(C)(i) A former or current member of the Arkansas National
Guard or a military reserve unit shall provide proof of service by providing
documentation reflecting his or her years of military service before
employment with the State of Arkansas, including without limitation:
(a) An NGB Form 23A;
(b) A DA Form 5016;
(c) A Career Retirement Credit Report;
(d) An Annual Statement of Service History;
(e) An Air National Guard/United States Air
Force Reserve Point Credit Summary Inquiry; or
(f) A reserve Point Statement.
(ii)(a) Military service credit under subdivision
(h)(1)(A) of this section for service in the Arkansas National Guard or a
military reserve unit shall be calculated as the total career points, or the
equivalent, on the documentation required under subdivision (h)(2)(C)(i) of
this section for each year the member was not an employee of the State of
Arkansas divided by three hundred sixty-five (365).
(b) As used in subdivision (h)(2)(C)(ii)(a) of
this section, "total career points, or the equivalent" means:
03/03/2025 12:50:35 PM LGL125

SB357
(1) "Total career points" on an NGB Form
23A;
(2) "Total points creditable" on a DA
Form 5016;
(3) "Total points creditable" on a
Career Retirement Credit Report;
(4) "Total points" on an Annual
Statement of Service History;
(5) "Total points for retirement" on an
Air National Guard/United States Air Force Reserve Point Credit Summary
Inquiry; and
(6) "Reserve retirement points" on a
Reserve Point Statement.
(3)(A) An employee under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this
section shall not receive military service credit under subdivision (h)(1)(A)
of this section for active-duty service accrued while concurrently a member
of the military service and an employee of the State of Arkansas.
(B) A current member of the Arkansas National Guard or a
military reserve unit shall not receive military service credit under
subdivision (h)(1)(A) of this section for any career points that he or she
accrued during a year when the member was a state employee for any part of
that year.














03/03/2025 12:50:35 PM LGL125